Washington statutes.
RCW 11.64.002

Inventory—Appraisement.

Within three months after receiving written request from the personal representative the surviving partner or partners of the partnership shall furnish the personal representative with a verified inventory of the assets of the partnership. The inventory shall state the value of the assets as shown by the books of the partnership and list the liabilities of the partnership. At the request of the personal representative, the surviving partner or partners shall permit the assets of the partnership to be appraised, which appraisal shall include the value of the assets of the partnership and a list of the liabilities.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 13; 1965 c 145 s 11.64.002. Prior: 1951 c 197 s 1; prior: (i) 1917 c 156 s 88; RRS s 1458. (ii) 1917 c 156 s 91; RRS s 1461.]

NOTES:

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.

Inventory of estate to identify decedent's share in partnership: RCW 11.44.015(1)(f).